Florida, session 2026, HB1167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds that the discharge
of inadequately treated wastewater and aging sewage disposal
facilities compromise the quality of the environment, including
freshwater, brackish water, and nearshore and offshore salt
waters, and threatens the quality of life and local economies in
the state that depend on those resources. The Legislature
further finds that requiring advanced wastewater treatment or
better at all sewage disposal facilities with a permitted
capacity of greater than 1 million gallons per day in this state
is a necessary long-term investment that will fundamentally
improve wastewater treatment.
(2) By July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, sewage
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1167-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1167 2026
disposal facilities with a permitted capacity of greater than 1
million gallons per day in this state must report to the
Department of Environmental Protection all of the following:
(a) Year of construction for the facility and any
maintenance or upgrades.
(b) Total permitted volume of water treated daily.
(c) Actual permitted volume of water treated daily,
including the most recent 1 year and 5 year averages.
(d) Current level of treatment, including concentrations
for each of the following:
1. Biochemical oxygen demand.
2. Suspended solids.
3. Total nitrogen.
4. Total phosphorus.
5. Perfluorooctanoic acid.
6. Perfluorooctanesulfonic acid.
7. Molybdenum.
8. Other contaminants of emerging concern as determined by
the department.
(e) Estimated total pollutant loading based on permitted
volume and concentrations.
(f) Disposal methods and the volume discharged to any
receiving waterbodies, if applicable, pursuant to s.
403.064(16), Florida Statutes.
(g) Total volume and concentration of any permitted and
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1167-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1167 2026
nonpermitted wastewater spills since 2010.
(h) Elevation of the facility and supporting
infrastructure.
(i) Location within a floodplain, flood zone, or coastal
high-hazard area and, if applicable, the corresponding zone
number.
(3) In order to prioritize the upgrade of sewage disposal
facilities and investments in wastewater infrastructure, by
December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Department of
Environmental Protection, in consultation with the water
management districts and sewage disposal facilities, shall
submit to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives a report detailing all
of the following for all sewage disposal facilities with a
permitted capacity of greater than 1 million gallons per day in
this state and post the annual report on its website:
(a) Year of construction for the facility and any
maintenance or upgrades.
(b) Total permitted volume of water treated daily.
(c) Actual permitted volume of water treated daily,
including the most recent 1 year and 5 year averages.
(d) Current level of treatment, including concentrations
for each of the following:
1. Biochemical oxygen demand.
2. Suspended solids.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1167-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1167 2026
3. Total nitrogen.
4. Total phosphorus.
5. Perfluorooctanoic acid.
6. Perfluorooctanesulfonic acid.
7. Molybdenum.
8. Other contaminants of emerging concern as determined by
the department.
(e) Estimated total pollutant loading based on permitted
volume and concentrations.
(f) Disposal methods and the volume discharged to any
receiving waterbodies, if applicable, pursuant to s.
403.064(16), Florida Statutes.
(g) Impairment status of any receiving waterbodies within
the watershed.
(h) Implementation status of total maximum daily loads and
basin management action plans and assigned reductions for load
allocations and wasteload allocations for pollutants of concern.
(i) Total volume and concentration of any permitted and
nonpermitted wastewater spills since 2010.
(j) Elevation of the facility and supporting
infrastructure.
(k) Location within a floodplain, flood zone, or coastal
high-hazard area and, if applicable, the corresponding zone
number.
100 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1167-00